Utah statutes.
16-16-302.   Formation of limited cooperative association -- Articles of
organization.
(1)  To form a limited cooperative association, an organizer of the
association must deliver articles of organization to the division for filing.
The articles must state:
(a)  the name of the association;
(b)  the purposes for which the association is formed;
(c)  the street address and, if different, mailing address of the
association's initial designated office and the name of the association's
initial agent for service of process at the designated office;
(d)  the street address and, if different, mailing address of the initial
principal office;
(e)  the name and street address and, if different, mailing address of each
organizer; and
(f)  the term for which the association is to exist if other than perpetual.
(2)  Subject to Subsection 16-16-113(1), articles of organization may contain
any other provisions in addition to those required by Subsection (1).
(3)  A limited cooperative association is formed after articles of
organization that substantially comply with Subsection (1) are delivered to
the division, are filed, and become effective under Subsection 16-16-203(3).
(4)  If articles of organization filed by the division state a delayed
effective date, a limited cooperative association is not formed if, before the
articles take effect, an organizer signs and delivers to the division for
filing a statement of cancellation.
